District of Columbia statutes.
15-905

Asserting and defending a foreign-money claim.

(a)

A person may assert a claim in a specified foreign money. If a foreign-money claim is not asserted, the claimant makes the claim in United States dollars.

(b)

An opposing party may allege and prove that a claim, in whole or in part, is in a different money than that asserted by the claimant.

(c)

A person may assert a defense, set-off, recoupment, or counterclaim in any money without regard to the money of other claims.

(d)

The determination of the proper money of the claim is a question of law.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791

History

1981 Ed., § 15-905.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.

Editor's Notes